Montana, session 2025, HB787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Route operator licensed to sell alcohol at retail -- access to financial
data -- unfair advantage -- use of information prohibited. (1) To prevent an unfair competitive advantage, a
route operator licensed under this chapter that also holds a license to sell alcoholic beverages to the public at
retail under Title 16 is subject to the provisions of this section.
(2) The route operator may not use financial data that puts the route operator at an unfair
competitive advantage relating to the acquisition, administration, and sale of an alcoholic beverage license
under Title 16.
(3) The route operator may not use financial data as leverage in the acquisition or sale of a license
under Title 16.
(4) The route operator, in operating the route operator's gambling business, may not restrict video
gambling machine games or machines that are in usage or available to the route operator's own alcoholic
beverage license from other alcoholic beverage licensees.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the term "financial data" means data that is acquired,
compiled, or otherwise obtained in the course and scope of the route operator's business that is available only
to the route operator through the conduct of the route operator's business and that would put the route operator
at a competitive advantage. Financial data includes information available only to the route operator that relates
to:
(a) alcoholic beverage licensees under Title 16;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 787

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 787.1
(b) gambling location information;
(c) consumer gambling information for a particular location or geographic area;
(d) a licensed location's financial information relating to gambling; or
(e) any other data that is available only to a route operator and is not otherwise available to the
public through reasonable investigation.

Section 2. Section 23-5-129, MCA, is amended to read:
"23-5-129. Route operator's license -- fees. (1) It is a misdemeanor for a person to conduct
business as a route operator without first obtaining a route operator's license from the department.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6), the department shall charge an annual license fee of
$1,000 for issuing or renewing a route operator's license. The department shall retain the fee for administrative
purposes.
(3) A route operator's license expires June 30 of each year, and the license fee may not be
prorated.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (6), the department may charge an additional, one-time
license application processing fee to cover the actual cost of processing the original license. The department
shall refund any amount of the application processing fee not needed to reimburse the department for actual
costs or shall collect an amount sufficient to reimburse the department for actual costs not completely covered
by the initial fee charged.
(5) The department shall retain for administrative purposes the license and application processing
fees collected under this section.
(6) The department may waive the license fee provided for in subsection (2) if the applicant is
licensed as a manufacturer or distributor and may waive the application processing fee provided for in
subsection (4) if the applicant is licensed as a manufacturer, distributor, or operator.
(7) The department may not renew or may revoke a license issued under this section for a
licensee that is found to have violated [section 1]."

Section 3. Section 23-5-603, MCA, is amended to read:
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 787

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 787.1
"23-5-603. Video gambling machines -- possession -- play -- restriction. (1) A licensed operator
may make available for public play only the number of approved video gambling machines specifically
authorized by this part.
(2) The video gambling machines specifically authorized by this part are bingo, poker, keno, video
line, and multigame video gambling machines. Only the number of approved machines for which permits have
been granted under 23-5-612 may be made available for play by the public on the premises of a licensed
operator. The department shall adopt rules allowing a video gambling machine that needs repair to be
temporarily replaced while it is being repaired with a video gambling machine that is approved under the permit
provisions of this part. A fee may not be charged for the replacement machine.
(3) A video line game approved by the department for play must be made available to any licensed
machine owner.
(4) A manufacturer may not charge a fee for the use of a bingo, poker, keno, video line, or
multigame video gambling machine on a daily basis or any other periodic basis.
(5) A licensed operator, distributor, route operator, or manufacturer is prohibited from referencing
games not authorized under this title in advertising, promoting, or inducing play of a video gambling machine.
The department shall further define by rule what advertising is allowed under this subsection.
(6) Machines on premises appropriately licensed to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises
consumption, as provided in 23-5-119, must be placed:
(a) be placed in a room, area, or other part of the premises in which alcoholic beverages are sold
or consumed; and
(b) be placed within control of the operator for the purpose of preventing access to the machines
by persons under 18 years of age; and
(c) if applicable, be available to the alcoholic beverages licensee by the route operator under
[section 1]."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 23, chapter 5, part 6, and the provisions of Title 23, chapter 5, part 6, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 787